Utah statutes.
63J-5-102.   Definitions.
(1)  As used in this chapter:
(a) (i)  "Agency" means a department, division, committee, commission,
council, court, or other administrative subunit of the state.
(ii)  "Agency" includes executive branch entities and judicial branch
entities.
(iii)  "Agency" does not mean higher education institutions or political
subdivisions.
(b) (i)  "Federal funds" means cash or other money received from the United
States government or from other individuals or entities for or on behalf of
the United States and deposited with the state treasurer or any agency of the
state.
(ii)  "Federal funds" includes federal assistance and federal assistance
programs, however described.
(iii)  "Federal funds" does not include money received from the United States
government to reimburse the state for money expended by the state.
(c)  "Federal funds reauthorization" means the formal submission from an
agency to the federal government:
(i)  applying for or seeking reauthorization of federal funds; or
(ii)  applying for or seeking reauthorization to participate in a federal
program that will result in federal funds being transferred to an agency.
(d)  "Federal funds request summary" means a document detailing:
(i)  the amount of money that is being requested or is available to be
received by the state from the federal government for each federal funds
reauthorization or new federal funds request;
(ii)  those federal funds reauthorizations and new federal funds requests that
are included as part of the agency's proposed budget for the fiscal year, and
the amount of those requests;
(iii)  the amount of new state money, if any, that will be required to receive
the federal funds or participate in the federal program;
(iv)  the number of additional permanent full-time employees, additional
permanent part-time employees, or combination of additional permanent full-
time employees and additional permanent part-time employees, if any, that the
state estimates are needed in order to receive the federal funds or
participate in the federal program; and
(v)  any requirements that the state must meet as a condition for receiving
the federal funds or participating in the federal program.
(e)  "Federal maintenance of effort requirements" means any matching, level of
effort, or earmarking requirements, as defined in Office of Management and
Budget Circular A-133, Compliance Requirement G, that are imposed on an agency
as a condition of receiving federal funds.
(f)  "New federal funds" means:
(i)  federal assistance or other federal funds that are available from the
federal government and that the state is not currently receiving;
(ii)  a federal assistance program or other federal program in which the state
is not currently participating;
(iii)  each federal funds reauthorization that would require the state, as a
condition for receiving the federal funds, to:
(A)  add additional permanent full-time employees, permanent part-time
employees, or combination of additional permanent full-time employees and
permanent part-time employees;
(B)  increase the amount of state matching funds required to receive the
federal funds or participate in the federal program; or
(C)  comply with new requirements in order to receive the federal funds or
participate in the federal program.
(g)  "New federal funds request" means the formal submission from an agency to
the federal government:
(i)  applying for or otherwise seeking to obtain new federal funds;
(ii)  applying for or seeking to participate in a new federal program that
will result in federal funds being transferred to an agency.
(h) (i)  "New state money" means money, whether specifically appropriated by
the legislature or not, that the federal government requires Utah to expend as
a condition for receiving the federal funds or participating in the federal
program.
(ii)  "New state money" includes money expended to meet federal maintenance of
effort requirements.
(i)  "Pass-through federal funds" means federal funds provided to an agency
that are distributed to local governments or private entities without being
used by the agency.
(j)  "State" means the state of Utah and all of its agencies, and any
administrative subunits of those agencies.
(2)  When this chapter describes an employee as a "permanent full-time
employee" or a "permanent part-time employee," it is not intended to, and may
not be construed to, affect the employee's status as an at-will employee.
